Utah statutes.
30-3-16.7.   Effect of petition -- Pendency of action.
The filing of a petition for conciliation under this act shall, for a period
of 60 days thereafter, act as a bar to the filing by either spouse of an
action for divorce, annulment of marriage or separate maintenance unless the
court otherwise orders.  The pendency of an action for divorce, annulment of
marriage or separate maintenance shall not prevent either party to the action
from filing a petition for conciliation under this act, either on his own or
at the request and direction of the court as authorized by Section 30-3-17;
and the filing of a petition for conciliation shall stay for a period of 60
days, unless the court otherwise orders, any trial or default hearing upon the
complaint.  However, when the judge of the family court division is advised in
writing by a marriage counselor to whom a petition for conciliation has been
referred that a reconciliation of the parties cannot be effected, the bar to
filing an action or the stay of trial or default hearing shall be removed.
